Missouri, session 2026, HB2143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.1670, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 135.1670, to read as follows:
135.1670. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Kansas border county", Johnson, Miami, or Wyandotte County in Kansas;
(2) "Missouri border county", any county with a charter form of government and with
more than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants, any
county of the first classification with more than eighty-three thousand but fewer than ninety-
two thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than four
thousand five hundred but fewer than five thousand inhabitants as the county seat, any county
of the first classification with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred
sixty thousand inhabitants, or any county of the first classification with more than ninety-two
thousand but fewer than one hundred one thousand inhabitants in Missouri.
2. (1) If any job that qualifies for a tax credit under sections 100.700 to 100.850 or
under sections 135.100 to 135.258, for funding under section 620.1023, or for a tax credit or
retention of state withholding taxes under sections 620.2000 to 620.2020, relocates to a
Missouri border county from a Kansas border county, no tax credits shall be issued, funding
provided, or retention of withholding taxes authorized for such job under such sections.
(2) The department of economic development shall determine any clawback
provisions relating to:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2143 2
(a) Tax credits issued or other funding provided by the state; and
(b) Tax credits issued or other incentives provided by any political subdivision.
3. If the director of the Missouri department of economic development determines
that the state of Kansas has enacted legislation or the governor of Kansas issued an executive
order or similar action which prohibits the Kansas Department of Commerce or any other
Kansas executive department from providing economic incentives for jobs that are relocated
from a Missouri border county to a Kansas border county, then the director shall execute and
deliver to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president pro
tempore of the senate a written certification of such determination. Upon the execution and
delivery of such written certification and the parties receiving such certification providing a
unanimous written affirmation, the provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall be effective
unless otherwise provided in this section. The provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall
not apply to incentives reserved on behalf of and awarded to Missouri employers prior to the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section taking effect.
4. If the director of the Missouri department of economic development determines
that the Kansas Department of Commerce or any other Kansas executive department is
providing economic incentives for jobs that relocate from a Missouri border county to a
Kansas border county, then the director shall execute and deliver to the governor, the speaker
of the house of representatives, and the president pro tempore of the senate a written
certification of such determination. Upon the execution and delivery of such written
certification and the parties receiving such certification providing a unanimous written
affirmation, the provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall not be effective until such time
as the director determines that the Kansas Department of Commerce or any other Kansas
executive department is not providing economic incentives for jobs that relocate from a
Missouri border county to a Kansas border county, and the director has executed and
delivered to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president pro
tempore of the senate a written certification of such determination and the parties receiving
such certification provide an unanimous written affirmation.
5. The director of the Missouri department of economic development shall notify the
revisor of statutes of all changes in whether subsection 2 of this section is effective.
[6. The provisions of this section shall expire August 28, 2021, unless at such time the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section are in effect. If the provisions of this section do not
expire on August 28, 2021, the provisions of this section shall expire on August 28, 2025.]
✔